Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Examination and Licensing of Dental Hygienists.

Sec. 08.32.010.
License required.

Except as provided in AS

08.32.095

, a person may not practice, offer or attempt to practice, or advertise or announce as being prepared or qualified to practice dental hygiene without a license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.014.
Qualifications for license.

An applicant for a license to practice dental hygiene shall

provide evidence to the board that the applicant

has successfully completed an academic program in dental hygiene of at least two years duration that, at the time of graduation, is accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association and is approved by the board;

has passed a written theory examination of the American Dental Association Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations or an equivalent examination approved by the board;

has successfully passed a state or regional dental hygiene clinical examination approved by the board;

has not had a license to practice dental hygiene revoked, suspended, or voluntarily surrendered in this state or another state;

is not the subject of an adverse decision based on a complaint, investigation, review procedure, or other disciplinary proceeding within the five years immediately preceding application or of an unresolved complaint, investigation, review procedure, or other disciplinary proceeding undertaken by a state, territorial, local, or federal dental licensing jurisdiction;

is not the subject of an unresolved or adverse decision based on a complaint, investigation, review procedure, or other disciplinary proceeding undertaken by a state, territorial, local, or federal dental licensing jurisdiction or law enforcement agency that relates to criminal or fraudulent activity, dental malpractice, or negligent dental care and that adversely reflects on the applicant’s ability or competence to practice as a dental hygienist or on the safety or well-being of patients;

is not the subject of an adverse report from the National Practitioner Data Bank or the American Association of Dental Boards Clearinghouse for Board Actions that relates to criminal or fraudulent activity or dental malpractice;

is not impaired to an extent that affects the applicant’s ability to practice as a dental hygienist;

has not been convicted of a crime that adversely reflects on the applicant’s ability or competency to practice as a dental hygienist or that jeopardizes the safety or well-being of a patient; and

meet the other qualifications for a license established by the board by regulation.

An applicant for a license to practice dental hygiene may be interviewed in person by the board or a designee of the board. The interview must be recorded. If the application is denied on the basis of the interview, the denial shall be stated in writing, with the reasons for it, and the record shall be preserved.

History.

(§ 2 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.015.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.32.020.
Examination required. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.030.
Licensure by credentials.

The board may provide for the licensing without examination of a dental hygienist who

meets the criteria of AS

08.32.014

;

submits proof of continued competence as specified in regulations adopted by the board;

is currently licensed to practice dental hygiene in another state or territory of the United States; and

pays the fees established under AS

08.01.065

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1953; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.035.
Temporary license. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.040.
Application and fee. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.050.
Disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 08.32.060.
Frequency and content of examination. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]

Sec. 08.32.070.
Licensing of dental hygienists.

The board shall issue each successful applicant a license upon payment of all required fees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1953; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 1969; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.071.
Renewal of license.

At least 60 days before expiration of a dental hygienist’s license, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall notify the licensed dental hygienist. Each licensee who wishes to renew a dental hygienist’s license shall submit a completed license renewal form, the appropriate fee, and evidence of continued professional competence as required by the board. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall, as soon as practicable, issue a dental hygienist license valid for a stated number of years. Failure to receive notification from the department under this section does not exempt a licensee from renewing the licensee’s dental hygienist license.

History.

(§ 8 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 16 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 14 SLA 2005; am § 5 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For continuing professional competence requirements, see 12 AAC 28, art. 4.

Sec. 08.32.080.
Lapse and reinstatement of license. [Repealed, § 7 ch 94 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.32.081.
Lapse and reinstatement of license.

A licensed dental hygienist who does not pay the renewal fee under AS

08.32.071

forfeits the hygienist’s license. The board may reinstate the license without examination within two years of the date on which payment was due upon written application, proof of continued professional competence, and payment of all unpaid renewal fees and any penalty fee established under AS

08.01.100(b)

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 36 SLA 1959; am § 8 ch 59 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.085.
Restorative function license endorsement.

The board shall issue a restorative function endorsement to a licensed dental hygienist if the licensee furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the licensee has

successfully completed a course offered by or under the auspices of a program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or other equivalent course or program approved by the board; and

passed the Western Regional Examining Board’s restorative examination or other equivalent examination approved by the board within the five years preceding the licensee’s endorsement application, or the licensee is licensed, certified, or otherwise permitted in another state or United States territory to perform restorative functions.

An endorsement issued under this section authorizes a licensed dental hygienist under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist to place restorations into a cavity prepared by the licensed dentist and thereafter carve, contour, and adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration.

The board may by regulation establish renewal and continuing education requirements for an endorsement under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 111 SLA 2008; am § 7 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.090.
Temporary license. [Repealed, § 15 ch 59 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.32.095.
Exemption from license requirement.

A person enrolled as a student in an accredited dental hygiene program may perform dental hygiene procedures as part of a course of study without a license if

the procedures are performed under the

general supervision of a member of the faculty who is licensed under AS 08.36, and under the direct or indirect supervision of a member of the faculty who is licensed under this chapter; or

direct or indirect supervision of a member of the faculty who is licensed under AS 08.36; and

the clinical program has received written approval from the board.

A person practicing dental hygiene under (a) of this section is subject to all other provisions of this chapter and laws and regulations that apply to the practice of dental hygiene by a licensed dental hygienist.

History.

(§ 10 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.32.097.
Fees. [Repealed, § 40 ch 53 SLA 2012.]